Utah statutes.
30-3-14.1.   Designation of judges -- Terms.

In a county within a judicial district having more than one judge of the district court but having a population of less than 300,000 and in which the district court has established a family court division, the presiding judge of such court shall annually, in the month of September, designate at least one judge to hear all cases under this act.  In a county within a judicial district having more than one judge of the district court and having a population of more than 300,000 and in which the district court has established a family court division, the presiding judge of such court shall annually, in the month of September, designate at least two judges to hear all cases under this act, and shall designate one of such judges as the presiding judge of such family court division.  Such judge or judges shall serve on the family court division not less than one year and devote their time primarily to divorce and other domestic relations cases.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 1969 General Session

